Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4051.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1)(a) Deferred loans shall be made in accordance with subsection (4) of this
section to individuals determined to be eligible under subsection (2) of this section in an
amount equal to the lesser of the actual closing costs on the purchase of a homestead, as
defined in ORS 311.666, by the individual and one percent of the purchase price of the
homestead.
(b) Deferred loans shall accrue interest at a rate of six percent simple interest per an-
num from the date on which the loan is made.
(2) An individual is eligible to claim a deferred loan if the individual:
(a) Purchases a homestead located in Oregon;
(b)(A) Individually owns the fee simple estate of the homestead under a recorded instru-
ment of sale; or
(B) If two or more owners live in the property and all owners file a claim jointly, owns
the fee simple estate with rights of survivorship under a recorded instrument of sale with
all other claimants;
(c) Has never previously owned a homestead in any jurisdiction;
(d) Purchases the homestead at a price that is not greater than the county median RMV,
as defined in ORS 311.666;
(e) Pays at least three percent of the purchase price in cash;
(f) Has insured the homestead for fire and other casualty; and
(g) Has a household income and net worth that are within the limits established under
ORS 311.668 (2).
(3)(a) Within 180 days following the purchase of a homestead, an individual seeking a
deferred loan must file a claim with the Department of Revenue that includes documentation
demonstrating to the department’s satisfaction the individual’s eligibility for the loan.
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 233

HB 4051
(b) A claim must be signed by the individual, subject to the penalties for false swearing
under ORS 162.075.
(c) The department shall establish by rule a timeline and other matters necessary for the
filing and review of claims.
(d) The department shall review all claims in a timely manner and notify the claimant
of the acceptance or rejection of the claim.
(e) An individual aggrieved by the rejection of a claim may appeal the rejection to the
Oregon Tax Court within the time and in the manner provided in ORS 305.404 to 305.560.
(4)(a) Claims shall be granted on a first-come, first-served basis based on the date on
which the claim was filed.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, no more than 500 deferred loans
may be made for any calendar year.
(5)(a) The deferred loans shall be made from moneys in the Senior Property Tax Deferral
Revolving Account established under ORS 311.701.
(b) The department may make deferred loans on a quarterly basis.
(6)(a) The receipt of a deferred loan gives rise to a lien against the homestead in the
amount of the loan, including interest accrued under subsection (1)(b) of this section and any
penalties imposed under subsection (8)(c) of this section, less any amounts paid in accord-
ance with subsection (7) of this section before the amount becomes due under subsection (8)
of this section.
(b) A lien arising under this section has the same priority as liens created under ORS
311.679.
(7) All or part of the amount of a deferred loan, including accrued interest, may be paid
without penalty at any time before the amount becomes due under subsection (8) of this
section.
(8)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, the amount of a deferred
loan, including accrued interest, becomes due when:
(A) The homestead to which the deferred loan relates is sold, or a contract to sell is
entered into, or some person other than the individual who entered into the deferred loan
agreement, including a transferee, as defined in ORS 311.666, becomes the owner of the
property.
(B) The property is no longer the homestead of the individual who entered into the de-
ferred loan agreement, except in the case of an individual who is required to be absent from
the homestead by reason of health or military service.
(C) If the homestead is a manufactured structure or floating home, the homestead is
moved out of this state.
(b)(A) If a circumstance listed in paragraph (a)(A) or (B) of this subsection occurs, the
amount described in paragraph (a) of this subsection becomes due and payable to the de-
partment on or before August 15 of the year following the calendar year in which the cir-
cumstance that triggers the payment occurs.
(B) If the circumstance listed in paragraph (a)(C) of this subsection occurs, the amount
becomes due and payable five days before the date on which the homestead is removed from
this state.
(c)(A) If an individual willfully makes a false statement or misrepresentation, or willfully
fails to report a material fact, to obtain a deferred loan under this section, the amount of
[2]

HB 4051
the deferred loan, including accrued interest and any penalties imposed under this paragraph,
becomes immediately due and payable.
(B) The department may impose a penalty not to exceed five percent of the principal
amount of the deferred loan for the false statement, misrepresentation or failure to report
a material fact.
(9)(a) If an amount that becomes due under subsection (8) of this section is not paid
within 90 days following the due date, the amount shall be deemed delinquent as of the due
date and the lien against the property shall be subject to foreclosure as if it were a purchase
money mortgage under ORS chapter 88.
(b) In a foreclosure action under this section, a court may award:
(A) Reasonable attorney fees to the prevailing party.
(B) All costs associated with foreclosure of the lien to the department if the department
prevails.
(10) All amounts paid under this section, including receipts from foreclosure proceedings,
shall be transferred to the Senior Property Tax Deferral Revolving Account.
(11) The department shall publish information about the deferred loan program, including
the eligibility requirements, claim process and terms of deferred loans, on the department’s
Internet website.
(12) The department may adopt any rules it considers necessary or convenient for ad-
ministering the deferred loan program established under this section.
SECTION 2. (1) Deferred loans may be made under section 1 of this 2026 Act for home-
steads purchased in calendar years 2026, 2027 and 2028.
(2) Notwithstanding any timelines established under section 1 (3) of this 2026 Act, claims
for a deferred loan with respect to a homestead purchased in calendar year 2026 may be made
at any time after the effective date of this 2026 Act and on or before December 31, 2026.
(3) The repeal of section 1 of this 2026 Act by section 3 of this 2026 Act is not a circum-
stance that triggers repayment of a deferred loan under section 1 (8) of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this 2026 Act are repealed on January 2, 2030.
SECTION 4. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.

[3]